Missouri, session 2026, SB1386.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 510, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
eight new sections, to be known as sections 510.500, 510.503,
510.506, 510.509, 510.512, 510.515, 510.518, and 510.521, to
read as follows:
510.500. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Uniform Interstate Depositions and
Discovery Act".
510.503. As used in sections 510.500 to 510.521, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Foreign jurisdiction", a state other than this
state;
(2) "Foreign subpoena", a subpoena issued under
authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction;
(3) "Person", an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation,
government or political subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(4) "State", a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin

SB 1386 2
Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction
of the United States;
(5) "Subpoena", a document, however denominated,
issued under authority of a court of record requiring a
person to:
(a) Attend and give testimony at a deposition;
(b) Produce and permit inspection and copying of
designated books, documents, records, electronically stored
information, or tangible items in the possession, custody,
or control of the person; or
(c) Permit inspection of premises under the control of
the person.
510.506. 1. To request issuance of a subpoena under
this section, a party shall submit a foreign subpoena to a
clerk of court in the county in which discovery is sought to
be conducted in this state. A request for the issuance of a
subpoena under sections 510.500 to 510.521 shall not
constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.
2. If a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of
court in this state, the clerk, in accordance with such
court's procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for
service upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is
directed.
3. A subpoena under subsection 2 of this section shall:
(1) Incorporate the terms used in the foreign
subpoena; and
(2) Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses,
and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the
proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party
not represented by counsel.

SB 1386 3
510.509. A subpoena issued by a clerk of court under
section 510.506 shall be served in compliance with the
Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and laws of
this state.
510.512. The Missouri supreme court rules of civil
procedure and laws of this state, and any amendments
thereto, apply to subpoenas issued under section 510.506.
510.515. An application to the court for a protective
order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a
clerk of court under section 510.506 shall comply with the
Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and the laws
of this state and be submitted to the court in the county in
which discovery is to be conducted.
510.518. In applying and construing sections 510.500
to 510.521, consideration shall be given to the need to
promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact it.
510.521. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 apply to requests
for discovery in cases pending on August 28, 2026.
✓